Washington statutes.
RCW 35.41.095

Revenue bonds for water or sewerage system—Pledge of utility local improvement district assessments.

The legislative body of any city or town may provide as an additional method for securing the payment of any such bonds issued to pay the whole or a portion of the cost of providing the city or town with a system of water or sewerage as set forth in RCW 35.43.042, that utility local improvement district assessments authorized to be made for the purposes and subject to the limitations contained in RCW 35.43.042 may be pledged to secure the payment of such bonds.

[ 1967 c 52 s 26.]

NOTES:

Construction—Severability—1967 c 52: See notes following RCW 35.43.042.